Utah statutes.
13-5a-103.   Private action for unfair competition.
(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), a person injured by unfair
competition may bring a private cause of action against a person who engages
in unfair competition.
(b)  In an action under this Subsection (1), a person injured by unfair
competition may recover:
(i)  actual damages;
(ii)  costs and attorney fees; and
(iii)  if the court determines that the circumstances are appropriate,
punitive damages.
(2)  A person may not bring an action described in Subsection (1) against:
(a)  a depository institution; or
(b)  an entity that:
(i)  controls a depository institution;
(ii)  is controlled by an entity that controls a depository institution; or
(iii)  is controlled by a depository institution.
